Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.310

Pesticides for foreign export not in violation of chapter.

No pesticides shall be deemed in violation of this chapter when intended solely for export to a foreign country, and when prepared or packed according to the specifications or directions of the purchaser. If not so exported, all the provisions of this chapter shall apply.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 31.]